North Carolina, session 2025, SB946.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Short Title. – This act shall be known as the "Keep Our Schools
Standing Bond Act of 2026."
SECTION 1.(b) Purpose. – It is the intent of the General Assembly by this act to
provide, subject to a vote of the qualified voters of the State, for the issuance of fifty billion
dollars ($50,000,000,000) general obligation bonds of the State for the purpose of providing
funds, with any other available funds, for public school facilities through grants to counties for
public school capital outlay projects and repairs and renovations.
SECTION 1.(c) Definitions. – Unless the context otherwise requires, the following
definitions apply in this section:
(1) Bonds. – Bonds issued under this section.
(2) Cost. – Without intending thereby to limit or restrict any proper definition of
this term in financing the cost of public school capital outlay projects
authorized by this section, any of the following:
a. The cost of constructing, reconstructing, enlarging, acquiring, and
improving projects and acquiring equipment and land therefor.
b. The cost of engineering, architectural, and other consulting services as
may be required.
c. Administrative expenses and charges, including expenses related to
determining compliance with applicable requirements of federal law
and expenses relating to issuance. Nothing in this section shall permit
use of bond funds to pay salaries or fees for bond administration; such
salaries and fees shall come from funds appropriated by the General
Assembly.
d. Finance charges and interest prior to and during construction and, if
deemed advisable by the State Treasurer, for a period not exceeding
three years after the estimated date of completion of construction.
e. The cost of bond insurance, investment contracts, credit enhancement
and liquidity facilities, interest rate swap agreements or other
derivative products, financial and legal consultants, and related costs
of bond and note issuance, to the extent and as determined by the State
Treasurer.
f. The cost of reimbursing the State for any payments made for any cost
described in this subdivision.
*S946-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
g. Any other costs and expenses necessary or incidental to the purposes
of this section.
Allocations in this section of proceeds of bonds to the costs of a project or
undertaking in each case may include allocations to pay the costs set forth in
sub-subdivisions c. through g. of this subdivision in connection with the
issuance of bonds for the project or undertaking.
(3) Credit facility agreement. – An agreement entered into by the State Treasurer
on behalf of the State with a bank, savings and loan association, or other
banking institution; an insurance company, reinsurance company, surety
company, or other insurance institution; a corporation, investment banking
firm, or other investment institution; or any financial institution or other
similar provider of a credit facility agreement, which provider may be located
within or without the United States of America, such agreement providing for
prompt payment of all or any part of the principal or purchase price (whether
at maturity, presentment or tender for purchase, redemption, or acceleration),
redemption premium, if any, and interest on any bonds or notes payable on
demand or tender by the owner, in consideration of the State agreeing to repay
the provider of the credit facility agreement in accordance with the terms and
provisions of such agreement.
(4) Notes. – Notes issued under this section.
(5) Par formula. – Any provision or formula adopted by the State to provide for
the adjustment, from time to time, of the interest rate or rates borne by any
bonds or notes, including the following:
a. A provision providing for such adjustment so that the purchase price
of such bonds or notes in the open market would be as close to par as
possible;
b. A provision providing for such adjustment based upon a percentage or
percentages of a LIBOR rate, a prime rate, or base rate, which
percentage or percentages may vary or be applied for different periods
of time; or
c. Such other provision as the State Treasurer may determine to be
consistent with this section and will not materially and adversely affect
the financial position of the State and the marketing of bonds or notes
at a reasonable interest cost to the State.
(6) Public school capital outlay project. – A project for the construction of one or
more new public school buildings or the renovation of one or more existing
public school buildings, for the building of technology infrastructure, for the
purchase of measures to ensure building security, for the purchase of
equipment for a public school building that has never been used for public
education purposes or equipment related to the improvement of an existing
public school building that will be used at the building or become affixed to
the building during its use for public education, for the purchase of land
necessary for construction to commence within 24 months of one or more
school buildings, and for other related capital outlay projects to provide
facilities for individual schools that are used for instructional or related
purposes. The term applies to facilities, infrastructure, security, and equipment
suitable for pre-kindergarten through grade 12 and applies to cooperative
innovative high schools, as defined in Part 9 of Article 16 of Chapter 115C of
the General Statutes, and facilities designed for high school courses that are
co-located on community college campuses. The term does not include
Page 2 Senate Bill 946-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
projects for facilities for centralized administration, trailers, relocatable
classrooms, or mobile classrooms.
(7) State. – The State of North Carolina.
SECTION 1.(d) Authorization of Bonds and Notes. – Subject to a favorable vote of
a majority of the qualified voters of the State who vote on the question of issuing bonds for capital
outlay projects for public schools and for capital outlay projects and repairs and renovations
funds for community colleges and The University of North Carolina in the election called and
held as provided in this section, the State Treasurer is hereby authorized, by and with the consent
of the Council of State, to issue and sell, at one time or from time to time, general obligation
bonds of the State to be designated "State of North Carolina Education Bonds," with any
additional designations as may be determined to indicate the issuance of bonds from time to time,
or notes of the State as provided in this section, in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding
fifty billion dollars ($50,000,000,000) for the purpose of providing funds, with any other
available funds, for the purposes authorized in this section. The principal amounts of bonds or
notes issued in any 12-month period shall not exceed two hundred fifty million dollars
($250,000,000). In determining whether this limit has been reached, the issuance of a note or
bond to pay an outstanding note is not considered an issuance.
SECTION 1.(e) Use of Education Bond and Note Proceeds. –
(1) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (2) of this subsection, fifty billion
dollars ($50,000,000,000) of the proceeds of education bonds and notes,
including premium thereon, if any, shall be used for the purpose of making
grants to counties for paying the cost of public school capital outlay projects
and repairs and renovations in the amounts determined, in its discretion, by
the Department of Public Instruction to maximize the benefit of the funds. In
making allocations of proceeds for the local school administrative unit, the
Department of Public Instruction shall take into account average daily
membership, whether the unit is located in a low-wealth county, average daily
membership growth over the past five years, and the age and condition of the
facilities of the unit. Any additional monies that may be received by means of
a grant or grants from the United States of America or any agency or
department thereof or from any other source to aid in financing the cost of
public school capital outlay projects authorized by this act may be placed by
the State Treasurer in the Education Bonds Fund or in a separate account or
fund and shall be disbursed, to the extent permitted by the terms of the grant
or grants, without regard to limitations imposed by this act.
(2) Special allocation provisions. – In determining the use of the proceeds of
education bonds and notes, including premium thereon, if any, set forth in this
act, the following special allocation provisions apply:
a. The proceeds shall be used for new construction or rehabilitation of
existing facilities and repairs and renovations. Any items purchased
with such proceeds and installed or replaced as part of a renovation or
rehabilitation must have a useful life of at least 10 years or must extend
the life of the facility by at least 10 years once renovated or
rehabilitated.
b. In the case of a local school administrative unit located entirely in one
county, the unit's total distribution amount shall be allocated to that
county. In the case of a local school administrative unit located in more
than one county, the unit's distribution amount shall be allocated
among the counties in which the unit is located in proportion to
average daily membership of the unit in each county. A unit's
distribution amount allocated to a county may be used only with
Senate Bill 946-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
respect to public school facilities of that unit. If two or more local
school administrative units are consolidated into one unit, the
distribution amounts determined pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection for the units shall be considered the distribution amount for
the merged unit.
c. In determining between projects for which bond proceeds are
allocated, the Department of Public Instruction shall give
consideration to those projects that primarily involve materially
improving the energy efficiency of the school facility.
SECTION 1.(f) Allocation and Tracking of Proceeds. –
(1) Education bonds. – The proceeds of education bonds and notes, including
premium thereon, if any, except the proceeds of bonds, the issuance of which
has been anticipated by bond anticipation notes or the proceeds of refunding
bonds or notes, shall be placed by the State Treasurer in a special fund to be
designated "Education Bonds Fund," which may include such appropriate
special accounts therein as may be determined by the State Treasurer and shall
be disbursed as provided in this section. Monies in the Education Bonds Fund
shall be allocated and expended as provided in this section.
Any additional monies that may be received by means of a grant or grants
from the United States of America or any agency or department thereof or
from any other source for deposit to the Education Bonds Fund may be placed
in the Education Bonds Fund or in a separate account or fund and shall be
disbursed, to the extent permitted by the terms of the grant or grants, without
regard to any limitations imposed by this section.
Monies in the Education Bonds Fund or any separate account established
under this section may be invested from time to time by the State Treasurer in
the same manner permitted for investment of monies belonging to the State or
held in the State treasury, except with respect to grant money to the extent
otherwise directed by the terms of the grant. Investment earnings, except
investment earnings with respect to grant monies to the extent otherwise
directed or restricted by the terms of the grant, may be (i) credited to the
Education Bonds Fund or (ii) used to satisfy compliance with applicable
requirements of the federal tax law.
The proceeds of education bonds and notes, including premium thereon,
if any, may be used with any other monies made available by the General
Assembly for funding the projects authorized by this section, including the
proceeds of any other State bond issues, whether heretofore made available or
that may be made available at the session of the General Assembly at which
this section is ratified or any subsequent sessions. The proceeds of education
bonds and notes, including premium thereon, if any, shall be expended and
disbursed under the direction and supervision of the Director of the Budget.
The funds provided by this section shall be disbursed for the purposes
provided in this section upon warrants drawn on the State Treasurer by the
State Controller, which warrants shall not be drawn until requisition has been
approved by the Director of the Budget and which requisition shall be
approved only after full compliance with the State Budget Act, Chapter 143C
of the General Statutes.
(2) Tracking of bond proceeds. – The State Treasurer or the State Treasurer's
designee is hereby authorized and directed to set up a comprehensive system
of tracking the proceeds of the education bonds and notes, including premium
thereon, if any, to the extent necessary to enable the State Treasurer or the
Page 4 Senate Bill 946-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
State Treasurer's designee to properly account for the use of such proceeds for
compliance with applicable requirements of the federal tax law or otherwise.
All recipients of such proceeds shall comply with any tracking system
implemented by the State Treasurer or the State Treasurer's designee for this
purpose. The State Treasurer may withhold proceeds if the recipient fails to
comply with this subdivision.
(3) Costs. – Allocations to the costs of a capital improvement or undertaking in
each case may include allocations to pay the costs set forth in sub-subdivisions
c. through g. of subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of this section in connection
with the issuance of bonds for that capital improvement or undertaking.
SECTION 1.(g) Election. – The question of the issuance of the bonds authorized by
this section shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State at an election to be held in
November of 2026. Any other primary, election, or referendum, validly called or scheduled by
law at the time the election on the bond question provided for in this subsection is held, may be
held as called or scheduled. Notice of the election shall be given in the manner and at the times
required by G.S. 163A-769(8). The election and the registration of voters therefor shall be held
under and in accordance with the general laws of the State. Absentee ballots shall be authorized
in the election.
The Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement (State Board) shall
reimburse the counties of the State for all necessary expenses incurred in holding the election
that are in addition to those that would have otherwise been incurred, the same to be paid out of
the Contingency and Emergency Fund or other funds available to the State Board.
Ballots, voting systems authorized by Subpart 2 of Part 3 of Article 20 of Chapter
163A of the General Statutes, or both may be used in accordance with rules prescribed by the
State Board. The bond question to be used in the ballots or voting systems shall be in substantially
the following form:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
The issuance of fifty billion dollars ($50,000,000,000) State of North Carolina
Education Bonds constituting general obligation bonds of the State secured by a pledge of the
faith and credit and taxing power of the State for the purpose of providing funds, with any other
available funds, for public school facilities suitable for pre-kindergarten through grade 12
through grants for public school capital outlay projects."
If a majority of those voting on a bond question in the election vote in favor of the
issuance of the bonds described in the question, those bonds may be issued as provided in this
section. If a majority of those voting on a bond question in the election do not vote in favor of
the issuance of the bonds described in the question, those bonds shall not be issued.
The results of the election shall be canvassed and declared as provided by law for
elections for State officers; the results of the election shall be certified by the State Board to the
Secretary of State in the manner and at the time provided by the general election laws of the
State.
SECTION 1.(h) Issuance of Bonds and Notes. –
(1) Terms and conditions. – Bonds or notes may bear such date or dates, may be
serial or term bonds or notes, or any combination thereof, may mature in such
amounts and at such time or times, not exceeding 40 years from their date or
dates, may be payable at such place or places, either within or without the
United States of America, in such coin or currency of the United States of
America as at the time of payment is legal tender for payment of public and
private debts, may bear interest at such rate or rates, which may vary from
time to time, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of
the State or otherwise as may be provided by the State, at such price or prices,
including a price less than the face amount of the bonds or notes, and under
Senate Bill 946-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
such terms and conditions, all as may be determined by the State Treasurer by
and with the consent of the Council of State.
(2) Signatures; form and denomination; registration. – Bonds or notes may be
issued as certificated or uncertificated obligations. If issued as certificated
obligations, bonds or notes shall be signed on behalf of the State by the
Governor or shall bear the Governor's facsimile signature, shall be signed by
the State Treasurer or shall bear the State Treasurer's facsimile signature, and
shall bear the Great Seal of the State of North Carolina or a facsimile thereof
shall be impressed or imprinted thereon. If bonds or notes bear the facsimile
signatures of the Governor and the State Treasurer, the bonds or notes shall
also bear a manual signature, which may be that of a bond registrar, trustee,
paying agent, or designated assistant of the State Treasurer. Should any officer
whose signature or facsimile signature appears on bonds or notes cease to be
such officer before the delivery of the bonds or notes, the signature or
facsimile signature shall nevertheless have the same validity for all purposes
as if the officer had remained in office until delivery, and bonds or notes may
bear the facsimile signatures of persons who at the actual time of the execution
of the bonds or notes shall be the proper officers to sign any bond or note,
although at the date of the bond or note such persons may not have been such
officers. The form and denomination of bonds or notes, including the
provisions with respect to registration of the bonds or notes and any system
for their registration, shall be as the State Treasurer may determine in
conformity with this section; provided, however, that nothing in this section
shall prohibit the State Treasurer from proceeding, with respect to the issuance
and form of the bonds or notes, under the provisions of Chapter 159E of the
General Statutes, the Registered Public Obligations Act, as well as under this
section.
(3) Manner of sale; expenses. – Subject to the consent of the Council of State, the
State Treasurer shall determine the manner in which bonds or notes shall be
offered for sale, whether at public or private sale, whether within or without
the United States of America, and whether by publishing notices in certain
newspapers and financial journals, mailing notices, inviting bids by
correspondence, negotiating contracts of purchase, or otherwise, and the State
Treasurer is authorized to sell bonds or notes at one time or from time to time
at such rate or rates of interest, which may vary from time to time, and at such
price or prices, including a price less than the face amount of the bonds or the
notes, as the State Treasurer may determine. All expenses incurred in
preparation, sale, and issuance of bonds or notes shall be paid by the State
Treasurer from the proceeds of bonds or notes or other available monies.
(4) Notes; repayment. –
a. Subject to the consent of the Council of State, the State Treasurer is
hereby authorized to borrow money and to execute and issue notes of
the State for the same, but only in the following circumstances and
under the following conditions:
1. For anticipating the sale of bonds to the issuance of which the
Council of State shall have given consent, if the State Treasurer
shall deem it advisable to postpone the issuance of the bonds.
2. For the payment of interest on or any installment of principal
of any bonds then outstanding, if there shall not be sufficient
funds in the State treasury with which to pay the interest or
installment of principal as they respectively become due.
Page 6 Senate Bill 946-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
3. For the renewal of any loan evidenced by notes herein
authorized.
4. For the purposes authorized in this section.
5. For refunding bonds or notes as herein authorized.
b. Funds derived from the sale of bonds or notes may be used in the
payment of any bond anticipation notes issued under this section.
Funds provided by the General Assembly for the payment of interest
on or principal of bonds shall be used in paying the interest on or
principal of any notes and any renewals thereof, the proceeds of which
shall have been used in paying interest on or principal of the bonds.
(5) Refunding bonds and notes. – By and with the consent of the Council of State,
the State Treasurer is authorized to issue and sell refunding bonds and notes
pursuant to the provisions of the State Refunding Bond Act for the purpose of
refunding bonds or notes issued pursuant to this section. The refunding bonds
and notes may be combined with any other issues of State bonds and notes
similarly secured.
(6) Tax exemption. – Bonds and notes shall be exempt from all State, county, and
municipal taxation or assessment, direct or indirect, general or special,
whether imposed for the purpose of general revenue or otherwise, excluding
inheritance and gift taxes, income taxes on the gain from the transfer of bonds
and notes, and franchise taxes. The interest on bonds and notes shall not be
subject to taxation as to income.
(7) Investment eligibility. – Bonds and notes are hereby made securities in which
all public officers, agencies, and public bodies of the State and its political
subdivisions; all insurance companies, trust companies, investment
companies, banks, savings banks, savings and loan associations, credit unions,
pension or retirement funds, other financial institutions engaged in business
in the State; executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may
properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or
belonging to them. Bonds and notes are hereby made securities that may
properly and legally be deposited with and received by any officer or agency
of the State or political subdivision of the State for any purpose for which the
deposit of bonds, notes, or obligations of the State or any political subdivision
of the State is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.
(8) Faith and credit. – The faith and credit and taxing power of the State are hereby
pledged for the payment of the principal of and the interest on bonds and notes.
In addition to the State's right to amend any provision of this section to the
extent it does not impair any contractual right of a bond owner, the State
expressly reserves the right to amend any provision of this section with respect
to the making and repayment of loans, the disposition of any repayments of
loans, and any intercept provisions relating to the failure of a local government
unit to repay a loan, the bonds not being secured in any respect by loans, any
repayments thereof, or any intercept provisions with respect thereto.
SECTION 1.(i) Variable Interest Rates. – In fixing the details of bonds and notes,
the State Treasurer may provide that any of the bonds or notes may:
(1) Be made payable from time to time on demand or tender for purchase by the
owner thereof, provided a credit facility agreement supports the bonds or
notes, unless the State Treasurer specifically determines that a credit facility
agreement is not required, upon a finding and determination by the State
Treasurer that the absence of a credit facility agreement will not materially or
Senate Bill 946-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
adversely affect the financial position of the State and the marketing of the
bonds or notes at a reasonable interest cost to the State;
(2) Be additionally supported by a credit facility agreement;
(3) Be made subject to redemption or a mandatory tender for purchase prior to
maturity;
(4) Bear interest at a rate or rates that may vary for such period or periods of time,
all as may be provided in the proceedings providing for the issuance of the
bonds or notes, including, without limitation, such variations as may be
permitted pursuant to a par formula; and
(5) Be made the subject of a remarketing agreement whereby an attempt is made
to remarket bonds or notes to new purchasers prior to their presentment for
payment to the provider of the credit facility agreement or to the State.
If the aggregate principal amount repayable by the State under a credit facility
agreement is in excess of the aggregate principal amount of bonds or notes secured by the credit
facility agreement, whether as a result of the inclusion in the credit facility agreement of a
provision for the payment of interest for a limited period of time or the payment of a redemption
premium or for any other reason, then the amount of authorized but unissued bonds or notes
during the term of such credit facility agreement shall not be less than the amount of such excess,
unless the payment of such excess is otherwise provided for by agreement of the State executed
by the State Treasurer.
SECTION 1.(j) Interpretation of Section. –
(1) Additional method. – The foregoing subsections of this section shall be
deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the
things authorized thereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and
additional to powers conferred by other laws and shall not be regarded as in
derogation of any powers now existing.
(2) Statutory references. – References in this section to specific sections or
Chapters of the General Statutes or to specific acts are intended to be
references to these sections, Chapters, or acts as they may be amended from
time to time by the General Assembly.
(3) Broad construction. – The General Assembly specifically has chosen to
combine what otherwise might be considered differing projects to be financed
into one bond bill and bond question because the General Assembly finds that
such differing projects, when taken together, constitute an interrelated, united,
and single plan for the State's infrastructure as stated aforesaid. Accordingly,
this section, being necessary for the health, welfare, and advancement of the
people of the State, shall be broadly construed to affect the purposes thereof.
(4) Inconsistent provisions. – Insofar as the provisions of this section are
inconsistent with the provisions of any general laws, or parts thereof, the
provisions of this section shall be controlling.
(5) Severability. – If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any
person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other
provisions or applications of this section that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application and, to this end, the provisions of this section
are declared to be severable.
SECTION 1.(k) Other Agreements. – The State Treasurer may authorize, execute,
obtain, or otherwise provide for bond issuance, investment contracts, credit and liquidity
facilities, interest rate swap agreements and other derivative products, and any other related
instruments and matters the State Treasurer determines to be desirable in connection with the
issuance of bonds and notes.
Page 8 Senate Bill 946-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2. Each entity, upon receiving the proceeds of education bonds and notes,
including premium thereon, if any, issued pursuant to and for projects listed in Section 1 of this
act, shall administer, supervise, and ensure that use of the proceeds comport with the purposes
provided in this act. Each local school administrative unit, along with the corresponding board
of county commissioners, shall jointly submit to the Department of Public Instruction a plan for
the expenditure of proceeds allocated to it under this act. After the Department of Public
Instruction determines that a local school administrative unit's planned expenditure of part or all
of the proceeds allocated to it is within the purposes provided in this act, the Department of Public
Instruction shall make the proceeds to which the plans apply available to the local school
administrative unit. Each local school administrative unit receiving the proceeds of education
bonds and notes, including premium thereon, if any, issued pursuant to Section 1 of this act shall
report by January 1, 2028, and quarterly thereafter, to the Department of Public Instruction on
the projects funded from education general obligation bonds authorized by Section 1 of this act,
and the Department of Public Instruction shall combine the reports and submit them to the Joint
Legislative Capital Oversight Committee, the House of Representatives Appropriations
Committee, and the Senate Committee on Appropriations/Base Budget. Each report shall include
the total project costs, the amount to be funded from the bonds, the expenditures to date from the
bonds and other sources, and the percentage of each project completed.
SECTION 3.(a) Projects funded in whole or in part with the proceeds of education
bonds and notes, including premium thereon, if any, issued pursuant to this act, and that portion
of funds estimated to be needed for escalation of costs shall remain with the Office of State
Budget and Management and shall be disbursed only for the following purposes:
(1) To address unforeseen contingencies related to the specific project for which
the funds were made available.
(2) To address inflation costs related to that specific project.
SECTION 3.(b) Any funds retained by the Office of State Budget and Management
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section at the time a project is completed shall be retained by
the Office of State Budget and Management. The Office of State Budget and Management shall
report on any funds retained pursuant to this subsection within 90 days of a project's completion.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding the period of time provided in G.S. 163A-1045(a) for
which transfers are effective, transfers of voters from a given precinct, for the purpose of voting,
to an adjacent precinct for the election held in November of 2026 shall be for that election only
and shall not apply to any subsequent election.
SECTION 5. Any funds from the Education Bond expended for school technology
for public schools shall be reported to the State Board of Education and shall be credited against
the judgment in N.C. Sch. Bds. Ass'n. v. Moore, No. 98-CVS-14159 (N.C. Super. Ct.)
SECTION 6. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 946-First Edition Page 9